Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1714
Fire training school; approved by State Fire Marshal and Nebraska Emergency Management Agency; attendance.

Any city or village in the State of Nebraska is hereby authorized to send any person or persons designated by its governing body to attend any fire training school operating within the State of Nebraska and that has been approved as a proper fire department training school for such purposes by the State Fire Marshal and the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency.

Laws 1959, c. 58, § 3, p. 252;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 3.